Louisiana, session 2026, HB252.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:83.1(A)(2) and 86(E)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 30:86(D)(11) and (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§83.1. Authorization of bonds
A.
* * *
(2) The bonds may be secured by an irrevocable pledge and dedication of
revenues of the trust authority, at the direction of the secretary, which shall consist
of all monies deposited in the fund pursuant to R.S. 30:86(D) except those monies
deposited pursuant to R.S. 30:86(D)(11), collected, derived, or received from the
oilfield site restoration fees and penalties imposed pursuant to R.S. 30:87 or any
other lawfully available revenues, if any, to the extent appropriated, provided that
annual debt service shall not be in excess of fifty percent of the pledged revenues
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-128 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 252
estimated to be received in the calendar year the bonds are issued, but shall not
include monies deposited pursuant to R.S. 30:86(D)(11) or site-specific trust account
monies as identified in R.S. 30:86(D)(6) and 88. The bonds of the issuer shall be
revenue bonds payable solely from the above-described sources, to the extent
appropriated and released from the state, and such pledge shall not constitute a
pledge of the full faith and credit of the state.
* * *
§86. Oilfield Site Restoration Fund
* * *
D. The following monies shall be placed into the Oilfield Site Restoration
Fund:
* * *
(11) One hundred percent of the portion of recurring severance tax revenues
collected on oil and gas produced by certified stripper wells in the Caddo Pine Island
Field that would have been deposited into the state general fund after allocations of
such revenues otherwise required by the Constitution of Louisiana and the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950.
E. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the monies in the fund
deposited pursuant to Paragraphs (D)(1) through (10) of this Section may be
disbursed and expended pursuant to the authority and direction of the secretary or the
Natural Resources Trust Authority for the following purposes and uses:
* * *
F. Monies deposited pursuant to Paragraph (D)(11) of this Section may be
disbursed and expended pursuant to the authority and direction of the secretary or the
Natural Resources Trust Authority for oilfield site restoration, plugging of orphan
wells, or both, in the Caddo Pine Island Field.
* * *
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-128 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 252
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on July 1,
2026, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.